Illinois, session 104th, HB3691.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. References to Act. This Act may be referred to 5as the School Radon Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. To protect children, teachers, staff, 7administrators and visitors from radioactive radon. 8    Section 10. The School Code is amended by changing 9Sections 10-20.48 and 34-18.39 as follows: 10    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.48)11    Sec. 10-20.48. Radon testing and mitigation.12    (a) Every It is recommended that every occupied school 13building of a school district that is occupied or will be 14occupied shall be tested by January 1, 2029 and shall be 15retested tested every 5 years thereafter for radon pursuant to 16rules established by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 17and Office of Homeland Security (IEMA-OHS IEMA).18    (b) All It is recommended that new schools of a school 19district shall be built using radon resistant new construction 20techniques in accordance with the American National Standards 21Institute/American Association of Radon Scientists and   HB3691- 2 -LRB104 09881 LNS 19949 b1Technologists CC-1000, Soil Gas Control Systems in New 2Construction of Multifamily, School, Commercial and Mixed-Use 3Buildings standard or a successor standard , as shown in the 4United States Environmental Protection Agency document, Radon 5Prevention in the Design and Construction of Schools and Other 6Large Buildings.7    (c) Each school district shall may maintain, make 8available for public review, and notify parents and faculty of 9all test results under this Section. The district shall report 10radon test results to the State Board of Education, which 11shall prepare a report every 2 years of the results from all 12schools that have performed tests, to be submitted to the 13General Assembly and the Governor.14    (d) If IEMA exempts an individual from being required to 15be a licensed radon professional, the individual does not need 16to be a licensed radon professional in order to perform 17screening tests under this Section. A school district may 18elect to have one or more employees from the district attend an 19IEMA-OHS-approved IEMA-approved, Internet-based training 20course on school testing in order to receive, from IEMA-OHS, 21an exemption from being required to be a licensed radon 22professional to conduct radon screening tests testing in 23schools in that school district. These school district 24employees must perform the measurements in accordance with 25procedures approved by IEMA-OHS IEMA. If an exemption from 26IEMA-OHS IEMA is not received, the school district must use a   HB3691- 3 -LRB104 09881 LNS 19949 b1licensed radon professional to conduct measurements.2    (e) If the results of a radon screening test under this 3Section are found to be 4.0 pCi/L or above, the school district 4shall may hire a licensed radon professional to perform 5confirmatory measurements before any mitigation decisions are 6made. If the confirmatory measurements verify radon levels of 74.0 pCi/L or above, the building shall are found, it is 8recommended that affected areas be mitigated within 2 years by 9a licensed radon mitigation professional with respect to both 10design and installation. IEMA-OHS IEMA may provide the school 11district with a list of licensed radon mitigation 12professionals. However, no radon mitigation is required if the 13school district has decommissioned or plans to decommission 14the building within 2 years following the radon screening 15test. The school district shall provide written documentation 16of plans to decommission to the State Board of Education. If 17abandonment or renovation does not take place within the 2 18years after the first failed radon test, the State Board of 19Education shall assess the situation and determine (i) any 20actions the school district must take and (ii) a schedule for 21those actions, including, but not limited to, a schedule that 22the school district must follow within a designated time to 23carry out the actions described in item (i).24    (e-5) Upon completion of any mitigation system 25installation, radon measurements shall be conducted by a 26licensed radon measurement professional pursuant to rules   HB3691- 4 -LRB104 09881 LNS 19949 b1established by IEMA-OHS to ensure mitigation system 2performance. If the results of a radon screening test under 3this Section are found to be 4.0 pCi/L or above, the system 4shall be modified until the results of a radon screening test 5under this Section are found to be below 4.0 pCi/L. 6    (f) A screening test under this Section may be done with a 7test kit found in a hardware store, department store, or home 8improvement store or with a kit ordered through the mail or 9over the Internet. However, the kit must be provided by a 10laboratory licensed in accordance with the Radon Industry 11Licensing Act.12    (g) A school district may use life safety funds, if 13available, for radon testing and mitigation.14    (h) A home rule unit may not regulate school radon issues 15in a manner that diminishes the school radon protections 16provided under this Section. This Section is a limitation 17under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 18Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule 19units of powers and functions exercised by the State. 20(Source: P.A. 96-417, eff. 1-1-10; 96-1000, eff. 7-2-10.) 21    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.39)22    Sec. 34-18.39. Radon testing and mitigation.23    (a) Every It is recommended that every occupied school 24building of the school district that is occupied or will be 25occupied shall be tested by January 1, 2029 and shall be tested   HB3691- 5 -LRB104 09881 LNS 19949 b1every 5 years thereafter for radon pursuant to rules 2established by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 3Office of Homeland Security (IEMA-OHS IEMA).4    (b) All It is recommended that new schools of the school 5district shall be built using radon resistant new construction 6techniques in accordance with the American National Standards 7Institute/American Association of Radon Scientists and 8Technologists CC-1000, Soil Gas Control Systems in New 9Construction of Multifamily, School, Commercial and Mixed-Use 10Buildings standard or a successor standard , as shown in the 11United States Environmental Protection Agency document, Radon 12Prevention in the Design and Construction of Schools and Other 13Large Buildings.14    (c) The school district shall may maintain, make available 15for public review, and notify parents and faculty of all test 16results under this Section. The district shall report radon 17test results to the State Board of Education, which shall 18prepare a report every 2 years of the results from all schools 19that have performed tests, to be submitted to the General 20Assembly and the Governor.21    (d) If IEMA exempts an individual from being required to 22be a licensed radon professional, the individual does not need 23to be a licensed radon professional in order to perform 24screening tests under this Section. The school district may 25elect to have one or more employees from the district attend an 26IEMA-OHS-approved IEMA-approved, Internet-based training   HB3691- 6 -LRB104 09881 LNS 19949 b1course on school testing in order to receive, from IEMA-OHS, 2an exemption from being required to be a licensed radon 3professional to conduct radon screening tests testing in 4schools in the school district. These school district 5employees must perform the measurements in accordance with 6procedures approved by IEMA-OHS IEMA. If an exemption from 7IEMA-OHS IEMA is not received, the school district must use a 8licensed radon professional to conduct measurements.9    (e) If the results of a radon screening test under this 10Section are found to be 4.0 pCi/L or above, the school district 11shall may hire a licensed radon professional to perform 12confirmatory measurements before any mitigation decisions are 13made. If the confirmatory measurements verify radon levels of 144.0 pCi/L or above, the building shall are found, it is 15recommended that affected areas be mitigated within 2 years by 16a licensed radon mitigation professional with respect to both 17design and installation. IEMA-OHS IEMA may provide the school 18district with a list of licensed radon mitigation 19professionals. However, no radon mitigation is required if the 20school district has decommissioned or plans to decommission 21the building within 2 years following the radon screening 22test. If abandonment or renovation does not take place within 23the 2 years after the first failed radon test, the State Board 24of Education shall assess the situation and determine (i) any 25actions the school district must take and (ii) a schedule for 26those actions, including, but not limited to, a schedule that   HB3691- 7 -LRB104 09881 LNS 19949 b1the school district must follow within a designated time to 2carry out the actions described in item (i).3    (e-5) Upon completion of any mitigation system 4installation, radon measurements shall be conducted by a 5licensed radon measurement professional pursuant to rules 6established by IEMA-OHS to ensure mitigation system 7performance. If the results of a radon screening test under 8this Section are found to be 4.0 pCi/L or above, the system 9shall be modified until the results of a radon screening test 10under this Section are found to be below 4.0 pCi/L. 11    (f) A screening test under this Section may be done with a 12test kit found in a hardware store, department store, or home 13improvement store or with a kit ordered through the mail or 14over the Internet. However, the kit must be provided by a 15laboratory licensed in accordance with the Radon Industry 16Licensing Act.17    (g) The school district may use life safety funds, if 18available, for radon testing and mitigation.19    (h) A home rule unit may not regulate school radon issues 20in a manner that diminishes the school radon protections 21provided under this Section. This Section is a limitation 22under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 23Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule 24units of powers and functions exercised by the State. 25(Source: P.A. 96-417, eff. 1-1-10; 96-1000, eff. 7-2-10.)